Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Child Protective Services
§ 14-3-205.
Child abuse or neglect; persons required to report.

Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe or suspect that a child has been abused or neglected or who observes any child being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would reasonably result in abuse or neglect, shall immediately report it to the child protective agency or local law enforcement agency or cause a report to be made. The fact a child, who is at least sixteen (16) years of age, is homeless as defined in W.S. 14-1-102(d) shall not, in and of itself, constitute a sufficient basis for reporting neglect. Female genital mutilation under W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v) when the victim is a minor shall be considered child abuse for mandatory reporting under this section.

If a person reporting child abuse or neglect is a member of the staff of a medical or other public or private institution, school, facility or agency, he shall notify the person in charge or his designated agent as soon as possible, who is thereupon also responsible to make the report or cause the report to be made. Nothing in this subsection is intended to relieve individuals of their obligation to report on their own behalf unless a report has already been made or will be made.

Any employer, public or private, who discharges, suspends, disciplines or penalizes an employee solely for making a report of neglect or abuse under W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

[W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-216

] is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally makes a false report of child abuse or neglect, or who encourages or coerces another person to make a false report of child abuse or neglect, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 181, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.8; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-116; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 2005, ch. 23, § 1; 2017 ch. 180, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (c) and (d).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence of (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added the last sentence.

Admissibility of child's statements to physician attributing fault. —

Where a physician, given his duty and his professional responsibility to determine whether a child abuse syndrome or a condition that requires treatment is present, questions a child concerning how the child was injured in order to assist him with respect to a diagnosis of child abuse syndrome, statements elicited attributing fault are pertinent to his diagnosis and treatment, and admitting these statements into evidence pursuant to the exception contained in Rule 803(4), W.R.E., is consistent with the policy of the court in child abuse cases. Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983), cert. denied, 467 U.S. 1253, 104 S. Ct. 3539, 82 L. Ed. 2d 844, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 2707 (U.S. 1984).

Immunity provided from liability resulting from reporting.—

Section

14-3-209

does not limit immunity suits based only on reporting. Rather, it provides immunity from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result because of reporting. Immunity includes participation in legal proceedings, as well as the underlying determination of the abuse which then led to the reporting. May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993).

Counselor was immune from civil or criminal liability for reporting the father's alleged abuse of his son under this section, and therefore her motion for summary judgment was properly granted, because she acted upon a reasonable suspicion and the father failed to rebut the presumption of good faith with his negligence allegations. The evidence showed that the son told the counselor that his father watched him shower and touched his genitals and buttocks while assisting him with his showers. Thomas v. Rosenberger, 2015 WY 7, 341 P.3d 390,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2015).

Counselor
was entitled to immunity under this section for her participation
in the child abuse investigation because the father presented the
court with no genuine issue of material fact that the counselor acted
in bad faith as he admitted he had no factual basis for his contention
that she made the digital penetration allegations to any law enforcement
agents and he did not provide the records or testimony of the investigations. Thomas v. Rosenberger, 2015 WY 7, 341 P.3d 390,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2015).

Privilege removed from all evidence regarding child. —

District court did not err by allowing a mother's mental health providers to testify to privileged communications because the mother was not entitled to reinstate the privilege for information that was previously disclosed pursuant to an “express waiver” of the privilege; even without the express waivers, the evidence was admissible at trial because there was reasonable cause to believe or suspect that the child was being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would result in neglect. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 28, 2008).

Stated

in

Alicea v. State, 13 P.3d 693,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 2000); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Cited

in

Leonard v. Converse County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 788 P.2d 1119,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1990); Elmore v. Van Horn, 844 P.2d 1078,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Evidence — Child Abuse and the Medical Diagnosis or Treatment Exception to the Hearsay Rule. Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 735 (1985).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil liability of physician for failure to diagnose or report battered child syndrome, 97 ALR3d 338.

§ 14-3-206.
Child abuse or neglect; written report; statewide reporting center; documentation and examination; costs and admissibility thereof.

Reports of child abuse or neglect or of suspected child abuse or neglect made to the local child protective agency or local law enforcement agency shall be:

Conveyed immediately by the agency receiving the report to the appropriate local child protective agency or local law enforcement agency and, if the person responsible for the welfare of a child is a member of the armed forces or if the child is enrolled in the defense enrollment eligibility reporting system of the United States department of defense, to the state judge advocate for the Wyoming military department. The agencies shall continue cooperating and coordinating with each other during the assessment or investigation; and

Followed by a written report by the receiving agency confirming or not confirming the facts reported. The report shall provide to law enforcement, the local child protective agency and the state judge advocate for the Wyoming military department when appropriate, the following, to the extent available:

The name, age and address of the child;

The name and address of any person responsible for the child’s care;

The nature and extent of the child’s condition;

The basis of the reporter’s knowledge;

The names and conditions of any other children relevant to the report;

Any evidence of previous injuries to the child;

Photographs, videos and x-rays with the identification of the person who created the evidence and the date the evidence was created; and

Any other relevant information.

The state agency may establish and maintain a statewide reporting center to receive reports of child abuse or neglect on a twenty-four (24) hour, seven (7) day week, toll free telephone number. Upon establishment of the service, all reports of child abuse or neglect may be made to the center which shall transfer the reports to the appropriate local child protective agency.

Any person investigating, examining or treating suspected child abuse or neglect may document evidence of child abuse or neglect to the extent allowed by law by having photographs taken or causing x-rays to be made of the areas of trauma visible on a child who is the subject of the report or who is subject to a report. The reasonable cost of the photographs or x-rays shall be reimbursed by the appropriate local child protective agency. All photographs, x-rays or copies thereof shall be sent to the local child protective agency, admissible as evidence in any civil proceeding relating to child abuse or neglect, and shall state:

The name of the subject;

The name, address and telephone number of the person taking the photographs or x-rays; and

The date and place they were taken.

Any physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner examining a child and finding reasonable cause to believe the child is a victim of child abuse or neglect and having reasonable cause to believe that other children residing in the same home may also be a victim of child abuse or neglect shall report to law enforcement the results of the examination and facts supporting reasonable cause with respect to the other child or children. Law enforcement may then bring any other child residing in the same home to a physician, physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner for examination. The examination shall take place within twenty-four (24) hours. Any physician, physician’s assistant, nurse practitioner or law enforcement officer denied access to a child for the purposes of examination under this subsection may seek an appropriate court order by ex parte proceedings or other appropriate proceedings to provide for the examination. After receiving the timely results of the examination, the examining physician, physician’s assistant, nurse practitioner or law enforcement officer shall consider whether temporary protective custody is necessary under W.S.

14-3-405

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 181, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.9; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-117; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, § 2; 2013 ch. 142, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 77, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a), adding paragraph designations, inserting the provisions in (a)(i), and in (a)(ii) deleting the provision that a report may be dispensed with for good cause shown, and specifying the requirements of the report; and in (c), substituted “document evidence of child abuse or neglect to the extent allowed by law” for “document child abuse or neglect.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “assessment or” in (a)(1).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), added “and, if the person responsible for the welfare of a child is a member of the armed forces or if the child is enrolled in the defense enrollment eligibility reporting system of the United States department of defense, to the state judge advocate for the Wyoming military department” in the first sentence; and in (a)(ii), substituted “the local child protective agency and the state judge advocate for the Wyoming military department when appropriate” for “or the local child protective agency.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d).

Applied

in

Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 14-3-207.
Abuse or neglect as suspected cause of death; coroner's investigation.

Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has died as a result of child abuse or neglect shall report to the appropriate coroner. The coroner shall investigate the report and submit his findings in writing to the law enforcement agency, the appropriate district attorney and the local child protective agency.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.9:1; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-118; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to coroners' inquests generally, see §

7-4-201

et seq.

§ 14-3-208.
Temporary protective custody; order; time limitation; remedial health care.

When a child is taken into temporary protective custody pursuant to W.S. 14-3-405(a) and (b), the person taking custody shall immediately notify the local department of family services office and place or transfer temporary protective custody to the local department of family services office as soon as practicable. The local department of family services office shall:

Accept physical custody of the child;

Make reasonable efforts to inform the parent, noncustodial parent or other person responsible for the child’s welfare that the child has been taken into temporary protective custody, unless otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Arrange for care and supervision of the child in the most appropriate and least restrictive setting necessary to meet the child’s needs, including foster homes or other child care facilities certified by the department or approved by the court. When it is in the best interest of the child, the department shall place the child with the child’s noncustodial birth parent or with the child’s extended family, including adult siblings, grandparents, great-grandparents, aunts or uncles. Prior to approving placement with the child’s noncustodial birth parent or extended family, the department shall determine whether anyone living in the home has been convicted of a crime involving serious harm to children or has a substantiated case listed on the central registry established pursuant to W.S.

14-3-213

. The department may leave the child in the care of a physician or hospital when necessary to ensure the child receives proper care. A neglected child shall not be placed in a jail or detention facility other than for a delinquent act;

Initiate an investigation of the allegations; and

Assess the child’s mental and physical needs, provide for the child’s ordinary and emergency medical care and seek emergency court authorization for any extraordinary medical care that is needed prior to the shelter care hearing.

The law enforcement or medical provider shall promptly notify the court and the district attorney of any child taken into temporary protective custody and placed in its care pursuant to W.S.

14-3-405

without a court order.

Temporary protective custody shall not exceed forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and legal holidays.

When the court orders the child into the legal custody of the department pursuant to W.S. 14-3-409(d) or

14-3-429

, the department shall:

Accept legal custody of the child;

Continue or arrange for, care, transportation and supervision of the child as provided in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section;

Assess the child’s mental and physical health needs and provide for the child’s ordinary and emergency medical care;

Arrange for the provision of the education of the child, including participation in individualized education or developmental services;

Participate in multidisciplinary team meetings to develop treatment recommendations for the child;

Perform any other duties ordered by the court relating to the care or custody of the child.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.9:2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-119; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “district or circuit court judge or district court commissioner” for “district court judge, district court commissioner or justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section in conformance with §

14-3-201

as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 236.

Kinship placement. —

District court erred in permanently placing a mother's children with their foster parents for adoption, rather than with their aunt and uncle. Compelling preference as to what was best for the children was placement with nuclear or extended family members.
LW v. State (In the Interest of JW), 2010 WY 28, 226 P.3d 873,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and application of statute allowing endangered child to be temporarily removed from parental custody, 38 ALR4th 756.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 21 ALR5th 248.

§ 14-3-209.
Immunity from liability.

Any person, official, institution or agency participating in good faith in any act required or permitted by W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result by reason of the action. For the purpose of any civil or criminal proceeding, the good faith of any person, official or institution participating in any act permitted or required by W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

shall be presumed.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 181, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.11; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-120; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Immunity for negligent reporters. —

This section provides immunity for all reporters of child abuse not acting in bad faith. Where there is no evidence of deliberately false accusations but only negligence, good faith will still remain presumed. Elmore v. Van Horn, 844 P.2d 1078,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. Feb. 4, 1993).

Counselor was immune from civil or criminal liability for reporting the father's alleged abuse of his son under this section, and therefore her motion for summary judgment was properly granted, because she acted upon a reasonable suspicion and the father failed to rebut the presumption of good faith with his negligence allegations. The evidence showed that the son told the counselor that his father watched him shower and touched his genitals and buttocks while assisting him with his showers. Thomas v. Rosenberger, 2015 WY 7, 341 P.3d 390,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2015).

Counselor
was entitled to immunity under this section for her participation
in the child abuse investigation because the father presented the
court with no genuine issue of material fact that the counselor acted
in bad faith as he admitted he had no factual basis for his contention
that she made the digital penetration allegations to any law enforcement
agents and he did not provide the records or testimony of the investigations. Thomas v. Rosenberger, 2015 WY 7, 341 P.3d 390,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2015).

Immunity provided from liability resulting from reporting. —

This section does not limit immunity suits based only on reporting. Rather, it provides immunity from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result because of reporting. Immunity includes participation in legal proceedings, as well as the underlying determination of the abuse which then led to the reporting. May v. Southeast Wyo. Mental Health Ctr., 866 P.2d 732,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 14-3-210.
Admissibility of evidence constituting privileged communications.

Evidence regarding a child in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report made pursuant to W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

shall not be excluded on the ground it constitutes a privileged communication:

Between husband and wife;

Claimed under any provision of law other than W.S. 1-12-101(a)(i) and (ii); or

Claimed pursuant to W.S.

1-12-116

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 181, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.12; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-121; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1985, ch. 127, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Physician-patient and psychologist-client privileges limited by this article. —

The privileges created between physician-patient and psychologist-client by §§

1-12-101

and 33-27-103 (now

33-27-123

) are limited by the subsequent enactment of this article, which sets forth a procedure for ascertaining and correcting child abuse and neglect. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

There is no indication that the legislature intended to repeal Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-210

when it enacted Wyo. Stat Ann. §

33-38-113

, and the two statutes are complementary; section

33-38-113

(a)(i) provides an exception to the privilege where abuse or harmful neglect of children, the elderly or disabled or incompetent individuals is known or reasonably suspected, and this exception is entirely consistent with §

14-3-210

.Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Privilege removed from all evidence regarding child. —

The language of this section is definite in removing the named privilege from all evidence “regarding a child”; such language does not restrict application to communications between the child patient or child client and the physician or psychologist, but includes communications between the mother and the physician and psychologist. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

District court did not err by allowing a mother's mental health providers to testify to privileged communications because the mother was not entitled to reinstate the privilege for information that was previously disclosed pursuant to an “express waiver” of the privilege; even without the express waivers, the evidence was admissible at trial because there was reasonable cause to believe or suspect that the child was being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would result in neglect. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Because a mother's physical and mental state was at the heart of the claim that she neglected her child, information the mother disclosed to her counselors was clearly “evidence regarding a child.” Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Seyle v. State, 584 P.2d 1081,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 237

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of husband-wife testimonial privilege and the Federal Rules of Evidence, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

For case note, “Evidence — Recognition of a Federal Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege. Jaffee v. Redmond, 518 U.S. 1, 116 S. Ct. 1923, 135 L. Ed. 2d 337, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 3879 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 873 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presence of child at communication between husband and wife as destroying confidentiality of otherwise privileged communication between them, 39 ALR4th 480.

Validity, construction and application of statute limiting physician-patient privilege in judicial proceedings relating to child abuse or neglect, 44 ALR4th 649.

§ 14-3-211.
Appointment of counsel for child and other parties.

The court shall appoint counsel to represent any child in a court proceeding in which the child is alleged to be abused or neglected. Any attorney representing a child under this section shall also serve as the child’s guardian ad litem unless a guardian ad litem has been appointed by the court. The attorney or guardian ad litem shall be charged with representation of the child’s best interest.

The court may appoint counsel for any party when necessary in the interest of justice.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.12:1; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-122; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of guardians ad litem, see Rule 17(c), W.R.C.P.

Court must appoint attorney for child before adjudicating termination issues. —

It is improper for the district court to adjudicate the substantive issues of termination of parental rights without appointing an attorney to protect the welfare of the child. In re Child X, 617 P.2d 1078,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1980).

Attorney may be appointed as guardian ad litem. —

The trial court did not err in appointing an attorney for one or more of the children to act as guardian ad litem for the children; the person appointed to represent the children was specifically referred to as a guardian ad litem, and his participation in the trial was within the boundaries set forth in case law.DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re "H" Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. Jan. 13, 2004).

Proceedings fatally defective where no guardian appointed in parental-rights termination litigation. —

Where no guardian ad litem for the children was appointed to represent the minors' best interest in parental-rights termination litigation, expressly contrary to subsection (a), the proceedings are fatally defective and the case will be remanded to the district court, where a guardian ad litem must be appointed and a new trial conducted. Curutchet v. Bordarrampe, 726 P.2d 500,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1986).

No reversal despite unjustified ex parte conference. —

An ex parte conference between the trial judge and the guardian ad litem appointed to represent the minor child of the parties could not be ethically justified, but did not require the reversal of an adjudication of child custody in a divorce action where no prejudicial error was manifested. Moore v. Moore, 809 P.2d 261,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1991).

Stated

in

Nation v. Nation, 715 P.2d 198,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 14-3-212.
Child protection teams; creation; composition; duties; records confidential.

The state agency and the local child protective agency shall encourage and assist in the creation of child protection teams within the communities in the state. The purposes of the child protection teams shall be to identify or develop community resources to serve abused and neglected children within the community, to advocate for improved services or procedures for such children and to provide information and assistance to the state agency, local child protection agency and multidisciplinary teams, if a multidisciplinary team has been appointed. The department may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to define the roles and procedures of child protection teams.

The local child protection team shall be composed of:

A member of the district attorney’s office;

A designated representative from the school district or districts within the area served by the team;

A representative from the local field office of the department of family services;

A representative from the county government;

A representative from each city and town in the county;

Representatives from other relevant professions; and

Temporary members selected for the needs of a particular case as determined by the team.

The local child protection team may:

Assist and coordinate with the state agency, the local child protective agency and all available agencies and organizations dealing with children;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

Coordinate the provision of appropriate services for abused and neglected children and their families;

Identify or develop community resources to serve abused and neglected children and advocate for improved services and procedures for such children;

Identify training needs, sponsor training and raise community awareness of child protection issues; and

Assist and make recommendations of appropriate services in individual cases brought to it by the state agency or the local child protection agency.

The local child protection team shall not act as a multidisciplinary team, but members of the child protection team may serve on a multidisciplinary team if appointed pursuant to W.S.

14-3-427

.

All records and proceedings of the child protection teams are subject to W.S.

14-3-214

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.12:2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-123; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “multi-disciplinary” before “child protection teams,” and added last two sentences; inserted present (b)(iii) through (b)(v), redesignating former (b)(iii) and (b)(iv) as (b)(vi) and (b)(vii); repealed former (c)(ii), pertaining to diagnosis and prognosis, rewrote (c)(iii), which read: “Provide an adequate treatment plan for the abused and neglected child and his family,” added (c)(iv) through (c)(vi); and added (d), redesignating former (d) as (e).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 14-3-213.
Central registry of child protection cases; establishment; operation; amendment, expungement or removal of records; classification and expungement of reports; statement of person accused.

The state agency shall establish and maintain a record of all child protection reports and a central registry of “under investigation” or “substantiated” child protection reports in accordance with W.S.

42-2-111

.

Through the recording of reports, the state agency’s recordkeeping system shall be operated to enable the state agency to:

Immediately identify and locate prior reports of cases of child abuse or neglect to assist in the diagnosis of suspicious circumstances and the assessment of the needs of the child and his family;

Continuously monitor the current status of all pending child protection cases;

Regularly evaluate the effectiveness of existing laws and programs through the development and analysis of statistical and other information; and

Maintain a central registry of “under investigation” reports and “substantiated” reports of child abuse or neglect for provision of information to qualifying applicants pursuant to W.S. 14-3-214(f).

Upon good cause shown and upon notice to the subject of an “under investigation” or “substantiated” report, the state agency may list, amend, expunge or remove any record from the central registry in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the state agency.

All reports of child abuse or neglect contained within the central registry shall be classified in one (1) of the following categories:

“Under investigation”; or

“Substantiated”.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 23, § 2.

Within six (6) months all reports classified as “under investigation” shall be reclassified as “substantiated” or expunged from the central registry, unless the state agency is notified of an open criminal investigation or criminal prosecution. Unsubstantiated reports shall not be contained within the central registry.

Any person named as a perpetrator of child abuse or neglect in any report maintained in the central registry which is classified as a substantiated report as defined in W.S. 14-3-202(a)(xi) shall have the right to have included in the report his statement concerning the incident giving rise to the report. Any person seeking to include a statement pursuant to this subsection shall provide the state agency with the statement. The state agency shall provide notice to any person identified as a perpetrator of his right to submit his statement in any report maintained in the central registry.

Conviction of a person under W.S. 6-2-502(a)(v) when the victim is a minor shall be included as a substantiated report of child abuse in the central registry under this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 181, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.13; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-124; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1994, ch. 39, § 1; 1995, ch. 136, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 86, § 2; 2005, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2; 2020 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, to require the state agency to maintain a central registry of “under investigation” and “substantiated” reports of child abuse and neglect, to remove provisions for a “closed” category of reports, to require that within six months all reports classified as “under investigation” be reclassified as “substantiated” or otherwise expunged except as specified, and to provide that unsubstantiated reports not be kept in the central registry, and to otherwise conform to Laws 2005, ch. 23.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (g).

Applicability. —

This section applies only to child protective proceedings where there has been an adjudication and finding of child abuse or neglect, not to convictions of sexual assault where no child protective proceedings have occurred. Johnson v. State, 922 P.2d 1384,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1996).